Washington statutes.
RCW 46.01.070

Functions performed by state patrol as agent for director of licenses transferred to department.

Functions named in RCW 46.01.030 which have been performed by the state patrol as agent of the director of licenses before June 30, 1965 shall be performed by the department of licensing after June 30, 1965.

[ 1979 c 158 s 118; 1965 c 156 s 7.]